Utah statutes.
78B-2-220.   Redemption when more than one mortgagor.
If there is more than one mortgagor, or more than one person claiming under a
mortgagor, some of whom are not entitled to maintain an action under the
provisions of this article, any one of them who is entitled to maintain an
action may redeem a divided or undivided part of the mortgaged premises as his
interest may appear, and have an accounting for a part of the rents and
profits proportionate to his interest in the mortgaged premises, on payment of
a part of the mortgage money, bearing the same proportion to the whole of the
money as the value of his divided or undivided interest in the premises bears
to the whole of the premises.
